Arkansas, session 2025, SB47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-1-201(b)(24), concerning the Uniform
Commercial Code definition of "money", is amended to read as follows:
(24) “Money” means a medium of exchange that is currently
authorized or adopted by a domestic or foreign government. The term includes
a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization
or by agreement between two (2) or more countries. "Money" does not include a
central bank digital currency.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-1-201(b), concerning the general
*ANS102*
01-27-2025 10:27:17 ANS102

As Engrossed: S1/27/25 SB47
definitions used in the Uniform Commercial Code, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(44) "Central bank digital currency" means a digital currency, a
digital medium of exchange, or a digital monetary unit of account issued by
the Federal Reserve System, a federal agency, a foreign government, a foreign
central bank, or a foreign reserve system that is made directly available to
a consumer by such entities. "Central bank digital currency" includes a
digital currency, a digital medium of exchange, or a digital monetary unit of
account issued by the Federal Reserve System, a federal agency, a foreign
government, a foreign central bank, or a foreign reserve system, that is
processed or validated directly by such entities.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-9-102(29), concerning the Uniform
Commercial Code — Secured Transactions definition of "deposit account", is
amended to read as follows:
(29) “Deposit account” means a demand, time, savings, passbook,
or similar account maintained with a bank. The term "deposit account" does
not include investment property, central bank digital currency, or accounts
evidenced by an instrument.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-45-102(17), concerning the definitions
of "deposit" and "deposit account" under the Arkansas Banking Code of 1997,
is amended to read as follows:
(17)(A) “Deposit” and “deposit account” mean the unpaid balance
of money or its equivalent received or held by a bank in the usual course of
its banking business and which represents a liability of the bank, for which
it has given or is obligated to give credit, either conditionally or
unconditionally, to a checking, savings, time or similar account, or that is
evidenced by its certificate of deposit or similar certificate or a check or
draft drawn against a deposit account and certified by the bank or a draft or
cashier's, officer's, or traveler's check or money order or similar
instrument on which the bank is primarily liable, and that has not been paid
and other obligations or instruments of a bank that may be included in the
definition of “deposit” or “deposit account” in department rules a demand,
time, savings, passbook, or similar account maintained with a bank.
(B) "Deposit" and "deposit account" do not include
01-27-2025 10:27:17 ANS102

As Engrossed: S1/27/25 SB47
investment property, central bank digital currency, or accounts evidenced by
an instrument;

/s/J. Boyd
































01-27-2025 10:27:17 ANS102